Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1227.
do enact as follows:AB1227,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1227,2,3220.835 (2) (fm) Senior citizen property tax credit. A sum sufficient to make the 3payments under s. 71.07 (8d).AB1227,24Section 2. 71.07 (8d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1227,2,6571.07 (8d) Senior citizen property tax credit. (a) Definitions. In this 6subsection:AB1227,2,1071. “Claimant” means an individual who has reached age 65 by December 31 of 8the taxable year to which the claim relates or an individual and his or her spouse 9filing a joint return, either of whom has reached age 65 by December 31 of the 10taxable year to which the claim relates, and who files a claim under this subsection.AB1227,2,11112. “Household” means an individual and his or her spouse.AB1227,2,13123. “Household income” means all taxable income received by an individual 13and his or her spouse.AB1227,2,19144. “Principal dwelling” means a dwelling that is owned and used by the 15claimant as a primary dwelling for the entire taxable year for which the credit 16under this subsection is claimed and the land surrounding it, not exceeding one 17acre, for use of the dwelling as a primary dwelling, including a part of a 18multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built 19that is used as the claimant’s primary dwelling.AB1227,3,7205. “Property taxes” means the property taxes, exclusive of special 21assessments, delinquent interest, and charges for service, paid by a claimant, and 22the claimant’s spouse if filing a joint return, levied on the claimant’s principal 23dwelling in this state less any property taxes levied that are properly included as a 24trade or business expense under section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 1principal dwelling on which the taxes were paid is owned by 2 or more individuals 2or entities as joint tenants or tenants in common or is owned by spouses as marital 3property, “property taxes” means that part of the property taxes paid that reflects 4the ownership percentage of the claimant, plus the ownership percentage of the 5claimant’s spouse for spouses who file a joint return. “Property taxes” includes 6monthly municipal permit fees with respect to a principal dwelling imposed under 7s. 66.0435 (3) (c).AB1227,3,168(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 9subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 10credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, an amount equal to 75 percent of the 11amount of the property taxes the claimant paid in the taxable year on the 12claimant’s principal dwelling. If the allowable amount of the claim exceeds the 13income taxes otherwise due on the claimant’s income, the amount of the claim not 14used as an offset against those taxes shall be certified by the department of revenue 15to the department of administration for payment to the claimant by check, share 16draft, or other draft from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (fm).AB1227,3,2017(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be claimed under this subsection if the 18claimant’s household income for the taxable year for which the claim relates is 19$24,500 or more or if the assessed value of the claimant’s principal dwelling for the 20taxable year for which the claim relates is $300,000 or more.AB1227,3,23212. a. No credit may be allowed under this subsection if the claimant or the 22claimant’s spouse files a claim under sub. (6e) that relates to the same taxable year 23for which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1227,4,224b. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for an amount of property 1taxes claimed as a credit under sub. (9) or subch. VIII, or both, that relates to the 2same taxable year for which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1227,4,53c. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for an amount of property 4taxes claimed as a credit under subch. IX that relates to the same taxable year for 5which a claim is made under this subsection.AB1227,4,763. Except as provided in subd. 6., only one claimant per household per taxable 7year may claim a credit under this subsection.AB1227,4,984. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for property taxes that the 9claimant pays on his or her principal dwelling that is leased to the claimant.AB1227,4,12105. If married persons who are eligible to claim the credit under this subsection 11file separate returns, each spouse may claim a credit under this subsection on the 12basis of his or her respective ownership interest in the principal dwelling.AB1227,4,14136. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 14the time period under s. 71.75 (2).AB1227,4,16157. Part-year residents and nonresidents of this state are not eligible for the 16credit under this subsection.AB1227,4,2017(d) Administration. 1. In administering this subsection, the department of 18revenue shall make available suitable forms with instructions for claimants, 19including a form that may be included with, or as a part of, the individual income 20tax form.AB1227,4,22212. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the credit under that 22subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.AB1227,323Section 3. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 24is amended to read:AB1227,5,10171.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 2preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 3beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 471.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 571.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 6and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), senior citizen 7property tax credit under s. 71.07 (8d), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.07 8(3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 971.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), estimated tax payments 10under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB1227,5,1111